Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 724.26, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. A person who is convicted of a felony in a state or federal court, or who is adjudicated delinquent on the basis of conduct that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult, and who knowingly has under the personâs dominion and control or possession, receives, or transports or causes to be transported a firearm or offensive weapon is guilty of a class âDâ felony the following: (1) A class âDâ felony for a first offense, with commitment to the custody of the director of the department of corrections for an indeterminate term not to exceed five years with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of two years . (2) A class âDâ felony for a second offense, with commitment to the custody of the director of the department of corrections for an indeterminate term not to exceed five years with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of four years. Senate File 462, p. 2 (3) A class âCâ felony for a third offense, with commitment to the custody of the director of the department of corrections for an indeterminate term not to exceed ten years with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of seven years. (4) A class âCâ felony for a fourth or subsequent offense, with commitment to the custody of the director of the department of corrections for an indeterminate term not to exceed ten years with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of ten years. b. The court shall not defer judgment or sentencing, or suspend execution of any mandatory minimum sentence of incarceration imposed by this subsection, except the court may suspend execution of any sentence of incarceration imposed under subparagraph (1) upon the recommendation of the county attorney. c. Earned time accrued by a person convicted under this subsection shall not be applied to reduce any mandatory minimum sentence imposed. Earned time accrued shall be credited against the personâs indeterminate term of incarceration, but shall not reduce any mandatory minimum sentence imposed. Sec. 2. REPEAL. Section 724.31A, Code 2025, is repealed. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 462, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor